Utah statutes.
17C-2-203.   Part of tax increment funds in urban renewal project area
budget to be used for housing -- Waiver of requirement.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), each urban renewal project
area budget adopted on or after May 1, 2000 that provides for more than
$100,000 of annual tax increment to be paid to the agency shall allocate at
least 20% of the tax increment for housing as provided in Section 17C-1-412.
(b)  The 20% requirement of Subsection (1)(a) may be waived in part or whole
by the mutual consent of the loan fund board and the taxing entity committee
if they determine that 20% of tax increment is more than is needed to address
the community's need for income targeted housing.
(2) An urban renewal project area budget not required under Subsection (1)(a)
to allocate tax increment for housing may allocate 20% of tax increment
payable to the agency over the life of the project area for housing as
provided in Section 17C-1-412 if the project area budget is under a project
area plan that is adopted on or after July 1, 1998.
